Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-409
Office of Juvenile Services; access to records; immunity.

The Office of Juvenile Services shall have access to and may obtain copies of all records pertaining to a juvenile committed to it or placed with it, including, but not limited to, school records, medical records, juvenile court records, probation records, test results, treatment records, evaluations, and examination reports. Any person who, in good faith, furnishes any records or information to the Office of Juvenile Services shall be immune from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed. The owners, officers, directors, employees, or agents of such medical office, school, court, office, corporation, partnership, or other such entity shall not be liable for furnishing such records or information.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 41.